District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.11b

Reduction of benefits for long-term TANF recipients.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, an individual who has received federally funded or locally funded TANF benefits for more than 60 months, whether or not consecutive, shall receive a reduction in his or her maximum benefit in accordance with § 4-205.52 and as set forth in rules issued pursuant to § 4-202.05(d) and § 4-205.52(d).

(b)

In determining the number of months that an individual has received TANF benefits, the District shall not count any month that the individual is a minor who is:

(1)

Not the head of household; and

(2)

(A)

Not the head of an assistance unit; or

(B)

Married to the head of an assistance unit.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

Within 12 months of, but no less than 90 days before, the elimination of benefits pursuant to this section, a client shall have the opportunity to complete or update an Individual Responsibility Plan. Pursuant to the Individual Responsibility Plan, the Department shall assist the customer with accessing support for addressing barriers to employment and assist with the transition to employment.

(f)

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 511b
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 522(b), 58 DCR 1008
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 5162(b), 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5153(b), 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5072(a), 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 4-205.52 and § 4-205.72.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “of benefits” for “in benefits” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 repealed (c), (d), and (f).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 deleted “in the District” following “TANF benefits” in (a).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 522(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5153(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5153(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5072(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5072(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5072(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Section 5151 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle N of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Time Limit Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 5163 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 5162 shall apply upon certification by the Chief Financial Officer that sufficient revenue is available in the June 2012, September 2012, or December 2012 revenue estimates to fund section 10002(a)(1) and (2)(A) of D.C. Law 19-168.

Section 5152 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-168, § 5163.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.